New Jersey, session 221, A226.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5) is amended to read as follows: 5.    As used in this section, "cost of living" means the CPI as defined in section 3 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-45). a.     Within 30 days following the approval of the Educational Adequacy Report, the commissioner shall notify each district of the base per pupil amount, the per pupil amounts for full-day preschool, the weights for grade level, county vocational school districts, at-risk pupils, bilingual pupils, and combination pupils, the cost coefficients for security aid and for transportation aid, the State average classification rate and the excess cost for general special education services pupils, the State average classification rate and the excess cost for speech-only pupils, and the geographic cost adjustment for each of the school years to which the report is applicable. Annually, within two days following the transmittal of the State budget message to the Legislature by the Governor pursuant to section 11 of P.L.1944, c.112 (C.52:27B-20), the commissioner shall notify each district of the maximum amount of aid payable to the district in the succeeding school year pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.), and shall notify each district of the district's adequacy budget for the succeeding school year. For the 2008-2009 school year and thereafter, unless otherwise specified within P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.), aid amounts payable for the budget year shall be based on budget year pupil counts, which shall be projected by the commissioner using data from prior years.  Adjustments for the actual pupil counts of the budget year shall be made to State aid amounts payable during the school year succeeding the budget year.  Additional amounts payable shall be reflected as revenue and an account receivable for the budget year. Notwithstanding any other provision of this act to the contrary, each district's State aid payable for the 2008-2009 school year, with the exception of aid for school facilities projects, shall be based on simulations employing the various formulas and State aid amounts contained in P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.).  The commissioner shall prepare a report dated December 12, 2007 reflecting the State aid amounts payable by category for each district and shall submit the report to the Legislature prior to the adoption of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.).  Except as otherwise provided pursuant to this subsection and paragraph (3) of subsection d. of section 5 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-47), the amounts contained in the commissioner's report shall be the final amounts payable and shall not be subsequently adjusted other than to reflect the phase-in of the required general fund local levy pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection b. of section 16 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-58) and to reflect school choice aid to which a district may be entitled pursuant to section 20 of that act. The projected pupil counts and equalized valuations used for the calculation of State aid shall also be used for the calculation of adequacy budget, local share, and required local share.  For 2008-2009, extraordinary special education State aid shall be included as a projected amount in the commissioner's report dated December 12, 2007 pending the final approval of applications for the aid.  If the actual award of extraordinary special education State aid is greater than the projected amount, the district shall receive the increase in the aid payable in the subsequent school year pursuant to the provisions of subsection c. of section 13 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-55). If the actual award of extraordinary special education State aid is less than the projected amount, other State aid categories shall be adjusted accordingly so that the district shall not receive less State aid than as provided in accordance with the provisions of sections 5 and 16 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-47 and C.18A:7F-58). In the event that the commissioner determines, following the enactment of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.) but prior to the issuance of State aid notices for the 2008-2009 school year, that a significant district-specific change in data warrants an increase in State aid for that district, the commissioner may adjust the State aid amount provided for the district in the December 12, 2007 report to reflect the increase. b.    Each district shall have a required local share.  For districts that receive educational adequacy aid pursuant to subsection b. of section 16 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-58), the required local share shall be calculated in accordance with the provisions of that subsection. For all other districts, the required local share shall equal the lesser of the local share calculated at the district's adequacy budget pursuant to section 9 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-51), or the district's budgeted local share for the prebudget year. In order to meet this requirement, each district shall raise a general fund tax levy which equals its required local share. No municipal governing body or bodies or board of school estimate, as appropriate, shall certify a general fund tax levy which does not meet the required local share provisions of this section. c.     Annually, on or before March 4, or on or before March 20 in the case of a school district with an annual school election in November, each district board of education shall adopt, and submit to the commissioner for approval, together with such supporting documentation as the commissioner may prescribe, a budget that provides for a thorough and efficient education. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection to the contrary, the commissioner may adjust the date for the submission of district budgets if the commissioner determines that the availability of preliminary aid numbers for the subsequent school year warrants such adjustment. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, for the 2005-2006 school year each district board of education shall submit a proposed budget in which the advertised per pupil administrative costs do not exceed the lower of the following: (1)   the district's advertised per pupil administrative costs for the 2004-2005 school year inflated by the cost of living or 2.5 percent, whichever is greater; or (2)   the per pupil administrative cost limits for the district's region as determined by the commissioner based on audited expenditures for the 2003-2004 school year. The executive county superintendent of schools may disapprove the school district's 2005-2006 proposed budget if he determines that the district has not implemented all potential efficiencies in the administrative operations of the district.  The executive county superintendent shall work with each school district in the county during the 2004-2005 school year to identify administrative inefficiencies in the operations of the district that might cause the superintendent to reject the district's proposed 2005-2006 school year budget. For the 2006-2007 school year and each school year thereafter, each district board of education shall submit a proposed budget in which the advertised per pupil administrative costs do not exceed the lower of the following: (1)   the district's prior year per pupil administrative costs; except that the district may submit a request to the commissioner for approval to exceed the district's prior year per pupil administrative costs due to increases in enrollment, administrative positions necessary as a result of mandated programs, administrative vacancies, nondiscretionary fixed costs, and such other items as defined in accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to section 7 of P.L.2004, c.73.  In the event that the commissioner approves a district's request to exceed its prior year per pupil administrative costs, the increase authorized by the commissioner shall not exceed the cost of living or 2.5 percent, whichever is greater; or (2)   the prior year per pupil administrative cost limits for the district's region inflated by the cost of living or 2.5 percent, whichever is greater. d.   (1)  A district's general fund tax levy shall not exceed the district's adjusted tax levy as calculated pursuant to sections 3 and 4 of P.L.2007, c.62 (C.18A:7F-38 and 18A:7F-39). (2)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2007, c.260). (3)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2007, c.260). (4)   Any debt service payment made by a school district during the budget year shall not be included in the calculation of the district's adjusted tax levy. (5)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2007, c.260). (6)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2007, c.260). (7)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2004, c.73). (8)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2010, c.44) (9)   Any district may submit at the annual school budget election, in accordance with subsection c. of section 4 of P.L.2007, c.62 (C.18A:7F-39), a separate proposal or proposals for additional funds, including interpretive statements, specifically identifying the program purposes for which the proposed funds shall be used, to the voters, who may, by voter approval, authorize the raising of an additional general fund tax levy for such purposes.  In the case of a district with a board of school estimate, one proposal for the additional spending shall be submitted to the board of school estimate. Any proposal or proposals submitted to the voters or the board of school estimate shall not: include any programs and services that were included in the district's prebudget year net budget unless the proposal is approved by the commissioner upon submission by the district of sufficient reason for an exemption to this requirement; or include any new programs and services necessary for students to achieve the thoroughness standards established pursuant to subsection a. of section 4 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-46). The executive county superintendent of schools may prohibit the submission of a separate proposal or proposals to the voters or board of school estimate if he determines that the district has not implemented all potential efficiencies in the administrative operations of the district, which efficiencies would eliminate the need for the raising of an additional general fund tax levy. (10)  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if a district proposes a budget with a general fund tax levy and equalization aid which exceed the adequacy budget, the following statement shall be published in the legal notice of public hearing on the budget pursuant to N.J.S.18A:22-28, posted at the public hearing held on the budget pursuant to N.J.S.18A:22-29, and printed on the sample ballot required pursuant to section 10 of P.L.1995, c.278 (C.19:60-10): "Your school district has proposed programs and services in addition to the core curriculum content standards adopted by the State Board of Education.  Information on this budget and the programs and services it provides is available from your local school district." (11)  Any reduction that may be required to be made to programs and services included in a district's prebudget year net budget in order for the district to limit the growth in its budget between the prebudget and budget years by its tax levy growth limitation as calculated pursuant to sections 3 and 4 of P.L.2007, c.62 (C.18A:7F-38 and 18A:7F-39), shall only include reductions to excessive administration or programs and services that are inefficient or ineffective. e.     (1)  Any general fund tax levy rejected by the voters for a proposed budget that includes a general fund tax levy and equalization aid in excess of the adequacy budget shall be submitted to the governing body of each of the municipalities included within the district for determination of the amount that should be expended notwithstanding voter rejection.  In the case of a district having a board of school estimate, other than a Type II district with a board of school estimate in which the annual election is in November, the general fund tax levy shall be submitted to the board for determination of the amount that should be expended.  If the governing body or bodies or board of school estimate, as appropriate, reduce the district's proposed budget, the district may appeal any of the reductions to the commissioner on the grounds that the reductions will negatively impact on the stability of the district given the need for long term planning and budgeting.  In considering the appeal, the commissioner shall consider enrollment increases or decreases within the district; the history of voter approval or rejection of district budgets; the impact on the local levy; and whether the reductions will impact on the ability of the district to fulfill its contractual obligations.  A district may not appeal any reductions on the grounds that the amount is necessary for a thorough and efficient education. (2)   Any general fund tax levy rejected by the voters for a proposed budget that includes a general fund tax levy and equalization aid at or below the adequacy budget shall be submitted to the governing body of each of the municipalities included within the district for determination of the amount that should be expended notwithstanding voter rejection.  In the case of a district having a board of school estimate, other than a Type II district with a board of school estimate in which the annual election is in November, the general fund tax levy shall be submitted to the board for determination.  Any reductions may be appealed to the commissioner on the grounds that the amount is necessary for a thorough and efficient education or that the reductions will negatively impact on the stability of the district given the need for long term planning and budgeting. In considering the appeal, the commissioner shall also consider the factors outlined in paragraph (1) of this subsection. In addition, the municipal governing body or board of school estimate shall be required to demonstrate clearly to the commissioner that the proposed budget reductions shall not adversely affect the ability of the school district to provide a thorough and efficient education or the stability of the district given the need for long term planning and budgeting. (3)   In lieu of any budget reduction appeal provided for pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, the State board may establish pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), an expedited budget review process based on a district's application to the commissioner for an order to restore a budget reduction. (4)   When the voters, municipal governing body or bodies, [board of education in the case of a school district in which the annual school election has been moved to November pursuant to subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2011, c.202 (C.19:60-1.1),] or the board of school estimate authorize the general fund tax levy, the district shall submit the resulting budget to the commissioner within 15 days of the authorization. f.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2007, c.260). g.    (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2007, c.260). (cf: P.L.2013, c.280, s.1) 2.    Section 41 of P.L.2011, c.202 (C.18A:7F-5.4) is amended to read as follows: 41.  A board of education of a school district in which the annual school election has been moved to November pursuant to subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2011, c.202 (C.19:60-1.1) [and which has determined to submit a proposal or proposals for additional funds to the voters at the annual school election pursuant to paragraph (9) of subsection d. of section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5),] shall adopt and submit to the commissioner for approval pursuant to subsection c. of section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5), a temporary budget for the school year pending the approval or disapproval of the [proposal or proposals for additional funds] general fund tax levy by the voters. The temporary budget shall be calculated pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (1) and paragraph (9) of subsection d. of section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5) or P.L.2007, c.62 (C.18A:7F-37 et al.), as appropriate. (cf: P.L.2011, c.202, s.41) 3.    Section 42 of P.L.2011, c.202 (C.18A:7F-5.5) is amended to read as follows: 42.  In the case of a school district in which the annual school election has been moved to November pursuant to subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2011, c.202 (C.19:60-1.1), if the voters fail to authorize the [proposal or proposals for additional funds pursuant to paragraph (9) of subsection d. of section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5)] general fund tax levy, the district shall submit the resulting final budget to the commissioner within 15 days of the [action of the voters] appropriate authorization pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection e. of section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5). If the voters [fail to] authorize the [proposal or proposals for additional funds] general fund tax levy, the temporary budget shall be the final budget for the district for that school year. (cf: P.L.2011, c.202, s.42) 4.    Section 43 of P.L.2011, c.202 (C.18A:7F-5.6) is amended to read as follows: 43.  In the case of a school district in which the annual school election has been moved to November pursuant to subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2011, c.202 (C.19:60-1.1), if the voters fail to approve [a proposal or proposals for additional funds pursuant to paragraph (9) of subsection d. of section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5)] the general fund tax levy and the districts budget is reduced pursuant to the provisions of subsection e. of section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5) or if the voters fail to approve a proposal or proposals for additional funds, the secretary of the board of education shall re-certify to the county board of taxation the sum or sums to be raised by special district tax for the school year. The amount re-certified shall be included in the taxes assessed, levied and collected in the municipality or municipalities comprising the district. (cf: P.L.2011, c.202, s.43) 5.    Section 44 of P.L.2011, c.202 (C.18A:7F-5.7) is amended to read as follows: 44.  The Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs and the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury, in consultation with the Commissioner of Education, shall take such action as deemed necessary for the delivery of estimated tax bills and the recertification of the school district tax levy pursuant to section 43 of P.L.2011, c.202 (C.18A:7F-5.6) for districts in which the annual school election is in November [and that determine to submit proposal or proposals for additional funds pursuant to paragraph (9) of subsection d. of section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5)]. (cf: P.L.2011, c.202, s.44) 6.    N.J.S.18A:8-20 is amended to read as follows: 18A:8-20.   The first board of education of the new district and the first board of education of the remaining district shall each prepare and submit[, if applicable,] to the voters of the district, as required by law, the first budgets for said district and they shall make proper provision for an election to be conducted, in accordance with the provisions of P.L.1995, c.278 (C.19:60-1 et al.), for the members of the board of education of the district to replace the appointed members of the board, for such terms that three members of the board of the district, as thereafter constituted, will be elected each year, at an annual election to be held in the district at the same time as that on which the next annual election for the original district would have been held. (cf: P.L.2011, c.202, s.4) 7.    N.J.S.18A:13-17 is amended to read as follows: 18A:13-17.    [a.]  The regional board of education shall, at each annual [April] school election, submit to the voters of the regional district the amount of money fixed and determined in its budget to be voted upon for the use of the regional schools of the district for the ensuing school year in the case of an April school election or the current school year in the case of a November school election and may submit thereat any other question authorized by this law to be submitted at such an election. The board may, in submitting to the voters the amount of money to be voted upon for the use of the regional schools of the district, identify the amount of money determined to be the constituent municipality's share. The board shall follow the procedures established in section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5) and N.J.S.18A:22-33. [b.  In the case of a regional district in which the annual school election is in November, the regional board of education shall fix and determine the district's budget for the ensuing school year and may submit at the annual school election any question authorized by law to be submitted at such an election. The board shall follow the procedures established in section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5), N.J.S.18A:22-33, and section 41 of P.L.2011, c.202 (C.18A:7F-5.4).] (cf: P.L.2011, c.202, s.13) 8.    N.J.S.18A:13-19 is amended to read as follows: 18A:13-19.    a.  If the voters reject any of the items submitted at the annual [April] school election, within two days thereafter the board of education of the regional district shall certify to the governing body of each municipality, included within the regional district, the item or items so rejected[, and such] .  In the case of an April school election, the governing bodies, after consultation with the board[,] and no later than May 19, shall determine the amount or amounts for the ensuing school year and cause the same to be certified by the respective municipal clerks to the board of education of the regional district.  In the case of a November school election, the governing bodies, after consultation with the board and no later than a date determined by the Commissioner of Education, shall determine the amount or amounts for the current school year and cause the same to be certified by the respective municipal clerks to the board of education of the regional district. The board and the governing bodies shall follow the procedures established in section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5) and N.J.S.18A:22-37. b.    Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of this section to the contrary, whenever the Commissioner of Education changes the annual school election date pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1995, c.278 (C.19:60-1), the commissioner shall change the deadline set forth in subsection a. of this section by which date the governing bodies are required to determine the amount for the ensuing school year and cause the same to be certified to the board of education of the regional district.  The commissioner in changing the deadline shall ensure that the number of calendar days from the changed date of the annual school election to the deadline is no less than the number of calendar days from the third Tuesday of April to May 19 of that calendar year. (cf: P.L.2013, c.173, s.1) 9.    N.J.S.18A:13-40 is amended to read as follows: 18A:13-40.    The board of education of a newly created regional district may, prior to taking charge and control of the educational facilities of the regional district, do all other acts and things which may be necessary for the proper organization and functioning of the public schools of the regional district during its first year, including the making of contracts for the employment of necessary personnel and for other proper purposes, the preparation and [, if applicable,] submission to the voters of the regional district for their approval or disapproval of the budget and the appropriations for the conduct of the public schools of the regional district during its first school year, the authorization of the purchase of real and personal property, and the construction, enlargement and repair of buildings, for school purposes, and the appropriations of the funds necessary to carry out the same and the authorization of the issuance and sale of bonds in order to provide for the payment therefor in whole or in part and the calling and holding of special elections when necessary for any such purposes and to carry out any or all of said purposes. (cf: P.L.2011, c.202, s.15) 10.  N.J.S.18A:22-33 is amended to read as follows: 18A:22-33.    a.  The board of education of a type II district not having a board of school estimate shall at the April school election, submit to the voters of the district, the amount of money fixed and determined in its budget pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5), excluding therefrom the sum or sums stated therein to be used for interest and debt redemption charges, in the manner provided by law, to be voted upon for the use of the public schools of the district for the ensuing school year, which amount shall be stated in the notice of the election, and the legal voters of the district shall determine at the April election, by a majority vote of those voting upon the proposition, the sum or sums, not exceeding those stated in the notice of the election, to be raised by special district tax for said purposes, in the district during the ensuing school year and the secretary of the board of education shall certify the amount so determined upon, if any, and the sums so stated for interest and debt redemption charges, to the county board of taxation of the county within two days following the certification of the election results and the amount or amounts so certified shall be included in the taxes assessed, levied and collected in the municipality or municipalities comprising the district for such purposes; except that, in the case of a district which , following the school election and the approval by the voters of the sum to be raised by special district tax for the schools of the district, determines that it has a greater surplus account available for the school year than estimated when the sum to be raised by special district tax was presented to the voters, the secretary of the board of education, with the approval of the commissioner, may between the date of the school election and the delivery of tax bills pursuant to R.S.54:4-64 re-certify to the county board of taxation the sum or sums to be raised by special district tax in the district during the ensuing school year, if the sum is lower than that approved by the voters in the school election, and if the reduction is equivalent to the additional amount available in the surplus account to be applied towards the district's budget. The amount re-certified shall be included in the taxes assessed, levied and collected in the municipality or municipalities comprising the district. b.    In the case of a district in which the annual school election is in November pursuant to subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2011, c.202 (C.19:60-1.1), by May 19 the secretary of the board of education shall certify the amount fixed and determined by the school board pursuant to N.J.S.18A:22-32 [other than any additional funds to be voted upon by the legal voters of the district] and the sums so stated for interest and debt redemption charges, to the county board of taxation of the county and the amount or amounts so certified shall be included in the taxes assessed, levied and collected in the municipality or municipalities comprising the district for such purposes; except that, in the case of a district which determines that it has a greater surplus account available for the school year than estimated when the sum to be raised by special district tax was certified to the county board of taxation of the county, the secretary of the board of education, with the approval of the commissioner, may between May 19 and the delivery of tax bills pursuant to R.S.54:4-64 re-certify to the county board of taxation the sum or sums to be raised by special district tax in the district during the ensuing school year, if the sum is lower than that initially certified to the county board of taxation of the county, and if the reduction is equivalent to the additional amount available in the surplus account to be applied towards the district's budget. The amount re-certified shall be included in the taxes assessed, levied and collected in the municipality or municipalities comprising the district. (cf: P.L.2011, c.202, s.20) 11.  N.J.S.18A:22-37 is amended to read as follows: 18A:22-37.    If the voters reject any of the items submitted at the annual [April] school election, the board of education shall deliver the proposed school budget pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5) to the governing body of the municipality, or of each of the municipalities included in the district within two days thereafter.  The governing body of the municipality, or of each of the municipalities, included in the district shall, after consultation with the board, and by May 19 in the case of an April school election or by a date determined by the Commissioner of Education in the case of a November school election, determine the amount which, in the judgment of the body or bodies, is necessary to be appropriated for each item appearing in the budget, pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5) and certify, or re-certify as appropriate in the case of a November school election,  to the county board of taxation the totals of the amount so determined to be necessary for each of the following: a.     General fund expenses of schools; or b.    Appropriations to capital reserve account. Within 15 days after the governing body of the municipality or of each of the municipalities included in the district shall make the certification to the county board of taxation, the board of education shall notify the governing body or bodies if it intends to appeal to the commissioner pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5) the amount which the body or bodies determined to be necessary to be appropriated for each item appearing in the proposed school budget. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section to the contrary, whenever the Commissioner of Education changes the annual school election date pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1995, c.278 (C.19:60-1), the commissioner shall change the deadline set forth in this section by which date the governing body of the municipality or of each of the municipalities included in the district is required to determine the amount necessary to be appropriated for each item appearing in the budget, and certify to the county board of taxation the totals of the amount so determined.  The commissioner in changing the deadline shall ensure that the number of calendar days from the changed date of the annual school election to the deadline is no less than the number of calendar days from the third Tuesday of April to May 19 of that calendar year. (cf: P.L.2013, c.173, s.2) 12.  N.J.S.18A:22-38 is amended to read as follows: 18A:22-38.    If the governing body or bodies fail to certify any amount determined to be necessary pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5) for any item rejected at the annual [April] school election, or in the event that the governing bodies of the municipalities comprising a school district, shall certify different amounts, then the commissioner shall determine the amount or amounts which in his judgment, are necessary to be appropriated, for each of the items appearing in the budget, submitted to the governing body or bodies, and certify, or re-certify as appropriate in the case of a November school election, to the county board of taxation the totals of the amount determined to be necessary for the general fund expenses of the schools; and the amount certified or re-certified shall be included in the taxes to be assessed, levied and collected in the municipality or municipalities for those purposes. (cf: P.L.2011, c.202, s.22) 13.  Section 1 of P.L.1995, c.278 (C.19:60-1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  Except as otherwise provided in this section, an annual school election shall be held in a [type] Type II district on the third Tuesday in April. However, in any school year, the Commissioner of Education shall make any adjustments to the school budget and election calendar which may be necessary to change the annual school election date or any other school budget and election calendar date if that date coincides with a period of religious observance that limits significantly the usual activities of the followers of a particular religion or that would result in significant religious consequences for such followers. The commissioner shall inform local school boards, county clerks and boards of election of these adjustments no later than the first working day in January of the year in which the adjustments are to occur. As used in this subsection "a period of religious observance" means any day or portion thereof on which a religious observance imposes a substantial burden on an individual's ability to vote. An annual school election shall be held simultaneously with the general election on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in school districts in which the annual school election has been moved to that date pursuant to subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2011, c.202 (C.19:60-1.1) or pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2012, c.78 (C.19:60-1.2). [The annual school election in November shall be for the purpose of submitting a proposal to the voters for the approval of additional funds in a Type II district without a board of school estimate pursuant to paragraph (9) of subsection d. of section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5), for the purpose of electing members of the board of education, and for any other purpose authorized by law.] b.    All school elections shall be by ballot and, except as otherwise provided by P.L.1995, c.278 (C.19:60-1 et al.), shall be conducted in the manner provided for general elections pursuant to Title 19 of the Revised Statutes. No party designation shall appear on any ballot to be used in a school election.  At the request of one or more candidates, the ballot for a school election may include a designation in not more than three words that conveys the principles which the candidate or candidates therein named represent, but such designation shall not contain the name, or a derivative or any part thereof, as a noun or an adjective of any political party entitled to participate in a primary election. (cf: P.L.2018, c.20, s.1) 14.  Section 1 of P.L.2011, c.202 (C.19:60-1.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  (1)  The question of moving the date of a school district's annual school election to the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November, to be held simultaneously with the general election, shall be submitted to the legal voters of a local or regional school district, other than a Type II district with a board of school estimate, whenever a petition signed by not less than 15% of the number of legally qualified voters who voted in the district at the last preceding general election held for the election of electors for President and Vice-President of the United States is filed with the board of education. The question shall be submitted to the voters of the district at the next general election, provided that at least 60 days have lapsed since the date of the filing of the petition. In the event that the question is not approved by the voters, no petition may be filed to submit the question to the voters within one year after an election shall have been held pursuant to any petition filed pursuant to this subsection. The date of the annual school election may be moved to the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November without voter approval, upon the adoption of a resolution by the board of education of a local or regional school district, other than a Type II district with a board of school estimate, or the governing body or bodies of the municipality or municipalities constituting the district. Prior to holding a meeting for the adoption of the resolution to move the date of the annual school election, the governing body or bodies of the municipality or municipalities constituting the district shall provide adequate notice of the meeting to the affected board or boards of education. (2)   In the event that the date of a school district's annual school election is moved to the day of the general election, [the annual school election in November shall be held for the purpose of submitting] a vote shall be held on the district's general fund tax levy for the budget year including any proposal to the voters for approval of additional funds pursuant to paragraph (9) of subsection d. of section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5), [for the purpose of electing] the election of members of the board of education, and for any other purpose authorized by law. [A vote shall not be required on the district's general fund tax levy for the budget year, other than the general fund tax levy required to support a proposal for additional funds.] (3)   In addition to the process set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection, in the event that all the constituent districts of a limited purpose regional school district approve moving the date of their annual school elections to November, by any of the procedures established pursuant to this subsection, then the annual school election for the limited purpose regional school district shall also be conducted simultaneously with the general election. (4)   In the event that the date of a school district's annual school election is moved to the day of the general election pursuant to this subsection, the board of education and the county board of elections shall enter into an agreement, pursuant to guidelines established by the Secretary of State, under which the board of education shall pay any agreed upon increase in the costs, charges, and expenses that may be associated with holding the school election simultaneously with the general election. b.    (1)  In the case of a school district that has moved the date of its annual school election to November pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the question of moving the date of the school district's annual school election to the third Tuesday in April shall be submitted to the legal voters of a local or regional school district, other than a Type II district with a board of school estimate, whenever a petition signed by not less than 15% of the number of legally qualified voters who voted in the district at the last preceding general election held for the election of electors for President and Vice-President of the United States is filed with the board of education. The question shall be submitted to the voters of the district at the next general election, provided that at least 60 days have lapsed since the date of the filing of the petition. The date of the annual school election may be moved to the third Tuesday in April without voter approval, upon the adoption of a resolution by the board of education of a local or regional school district, other than a Type II district with a board of school estimate, or the governing body or bodies of the municipality or municipalities constituting the district.  Prior to holding a meeting for the adoption of the resolution to move the date of the annual school election, the governing body or bodies of the municipality or municipalities constituting the district shall provide adequate notice of the meeting to the affected board or boards of education. No resolution may be adopted and no petition may be filed pursuant to this subsection until at least four annual school elections have been held in November. (2)   In the event that the date of the annual school election is moved to the third Tuesday in April, a vote shall be held on the district's general fund tax levy for the budget year including any proposal for additional funds pursuant to paragraph (9) of subsection d. of section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5), the election of members of the board of education, and for any other purpose authorized by law. (3)   In addition to the process set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection, in the event that all the constituent districts of a limited purpose regional school district approve moving the date of their annual school elections to the third Tuesday in April, by any of the procedures established pursuant to this subsection, then the annual school election for the limited purpose regional school district shall also be conducted on the third Tuesday in April. c.    Notice, in writing, to change the date of a school election from the third Tuesday in April to the first Tuesday in November shall be given to the county clerk no less than 60 days prior to the third Tuesday in April to take effect for that year's election.  For a change from the first Tuesday in November to the third Tuesday in April, notice must be given to the county clerk no less than 85 days prior to the third Tuesday in April to take effect for that year's election.  Timely notice shall also be given by the board of education or municipal governing body adopting such resolution to any other affected boards of education and municipal governing bodies. (cf: P.L.2013, c.172, s.5) 15.  Section 4 of P.L.1995, c.278 (C.19:60-4) is amended to read as follows: 4.    The secretary of each board of education shall, not later than 10 o'clock a.m. of the 18th day preceding the annual April school election or a special school election, make and certify and forward to the clerk of the county in which the school district is located a statement designating the public question to be voted upon by the voters of the district which may be required pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1995, c.278 (C.19:60-1 et al.) or Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes. The secretary of each board of education of a school district in which the annual school election has been moved to November pursuant to subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2011, c.202 (C.19:60-1.1), not later than 10 o'clock a.m. of the 60th day preceding the November school election, shall make and certify and forward to the clerk of the county in which the school district is located a statement designating [any] the public question to be voted upon by the voters of the district which may be required pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1995, c.278 (C.19:60-1 et al.) or Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes. (cf: P.L.2011, c.202, s.35) 16.  Section 9 of P.L.1995, c.278 (C.19:60-9) is amended to read as follows: 9.    The ballot for a school election shall be a single or blanket form of ballot, upon which shall be printed in bold-faced type the words "OFFICIAL SCHOOL ELECTION BALLOT" or "OFFICIAL SPECIAL SCHOOL ELECTION BALLOT," as appropriate. Any public question which is to be submitted to the voters at a school election shall be printed in a separate space below or to the right of, as the county clerk shall determine, the listing of candidates in the election. In the columns in which are listed the titles of the offices to be filled at a school election and the names of candidates for those offices, the title of and the names of candidates for the office of member of the regional board of education shall appear above the title of and the names of candidates for the office of member of the local board of education. With respect to either office, in the event that one or more persons are to be elected to membership thereon for a full term and one or more persons are to be elected to membership thereon to fill an unexpired term, the ballots shall designate which of the candidates to be voted for is to be elected for a full term and which for an unexpired term. In all cases in which one or more persons are to be elected for an unexpired term, the ballots shall indicate the duration of that unexpired term. The names of two or more candidates for any given term who have notified the secretary of the board, or the county clerk if the annual school election is to be held in November, in writing that they wish to be bracketed together with their chosen designation, if any, shall appear as a group in the appropriate location on the ballot, depending on whether the candidates are to be elected to fill an expired or an unexpired term. All public questions to be voted upon at a school election by the voters of more than one municipality shall be placed first before any question to be voted upon at that election by the voters of a single municipality. When the public question to be voted upon by the voters of a regional school district is the amount of money to be raised for the use of the regional schools of the district, the amount of money determined to be the constituent municipality's share thereof may be identified on the ballot pursuant to N.J.S.18A:13-17. Every county clerk shall have ready for the printer a copy of the contents of official ballots required by law to be printed for use at a school election, as follows: in the case of the annual April school election, not later than the 17th day preceding that election; in the case of any special school election, not later than two business days following receipt by the clerk of official notice of the complete content of the ballot to be voted upon at that election; and in the case of the annual November school election, in accordance with the provisions of R.S.19:14-1. The ballots for an annual school election to be held simultaneously with the general election shall be in accordance with the provisions of chapter 14 of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes. At an annual school election held simultaneously with the general election, the names of the candidates for the office of member of the board of education shall appear on the ballot separately from the names of candidates for other offices whenever possible. [Any] The districts general fund tax levy for the budget year including any proposals for additional funds pursuant to paragraph (9) of subsection d. of section 5 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-5) shall appear on the ballot near the names of the candidates for the office of member of the board of education whenever possible. (cf: P.L.2018, c.20, s.4) 17.  This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Pursuant to P.L.2011, c.202 (C.19:60-1.1 et al.), procedures were established whereby the annual school election in a Type II school district could be moved from April to the date of the general election.  A school election held in November is only for the purpose of electing the districts board members and for voting on any proposal for additional funds above the school districts tax levy cap.  For a school district which holds its annual school election in November, no voter approval is required for the base budget. This bill will return to voters residing in school districts in which the annual school election has been moved to November the right to approve or disapprove the districts base budget.  Under the provisions of this bill, a voter at the November school election will have the right to vote on the same matters that are presented to a voter at an April school election. Under the provisions of this bill, a school district with a November school election will continue to submit its budget to the commissioner by March 20, except that this budget will be a temporary budget for the upcoming school year.  As current law provides, the secretary of the board of education by May 19 will certify the amount fixed and determined by the school board to the county board of taxation and the amount certified will be included in the taxes levied and collected in the municipality or municipalities comprising the district.  If the voters approve the budget at the November school election, the temporary budget will be the final budget for the district for that school year.  If the voters disapprove the budget, the budget will be submitted to the governing body of each of the municipalities included within the district for determination of the amount that should be expended notwithstanding voter rejection, as is the process under current law for defeated school budgets.  If under this process the general fund tax levy of the district is reduced, or if the voters in November fail to approve any separate proposal on the ballot to spend above cap, then the secretary of the board of education will re-certify to the county board of taxation the sum or sums to be raised for that school year.